toy.foma
define PreventGemination n -> 0 || .#.   a a _ "^" n .o. ! aane+naqe [Jacobson (2001) p.31]
                         n -> 0 || .#. t u u _ "^" n .o. ! tuune+naqutke [Badten (2008) p.650]
                         v -> 0 || .#. n u u _ "^" v .o. ! nuuve+vig [Badten (2008) p.693]
						 s -> 0 || .         _ s     ;   ! +(te)ste+@~:(i/u)ma [Kiiluuq]


define CleanupDigraph %{k%}   -> 0   .o.
                      %{g%} h -> g h .o.
                      %{t%}   -> t   ;


define AssimilateEnclitic g h -> q || _ ("^") "^" l l u   .#. .o. ! ("^") since [Abs][Sg]+{encl} maps to ^^{encl}
                          n g -> 0                            ,   ! [Jacobson (2001) p.91]
                          l l -> l                            ,   ! [Badten (2008) Appendix p.705]
                            t -> n                            ,
                            k -> g || _ ("^") "^" n g u q .#. .o.
                          g h -> q || _ ("^") "^" s a     .#. .o.
                            t -> s || _ ("^") "^" t a     .#. ;


define CleanupMorphBoundary "^" -> 0 ;


define Undoubling l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || _ [ Stop | f |  s]                      .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || [ Stop | f | s | [C - g - w] h ] _ .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || _ l l                                   .o.
                  l l -> l, r r -> r, g g -> g, g h h -> g h, g h h w -> g h w || [ l l | r r | g g | g h h | g h h w ] _ .o.
                  m m -> m, n n -> n, n g n g -> n g, n g n g w -> n g w       || [ Stop | f | s | [C - g - w] h ] _      .o.
                  m m -> m, n n -> n, n g n g -> n g, n g n g w -> n g w       || [ l l | r r | g g | g h h | g h h w ] _ ;


!==============
! RULE CASCADE
!==============

define Rules [
    !------------------------------
    ! lexical string rewrite
    !------------------------------
    RewriteSubordinative .o.
    SFGKeKa              .o.
    Uteta                .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! modify -te rules
    !-------------------------------
    SpecialTE            .o.
    UnmarkSpecialTE      .o.
    ISuffixTE            .o.
    LabialTE             .o.
    ApicalTE             .o.
    VelarTE              .o.
    DropTE               .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! -e dropping and hopping rules
    !-------------------------------
    SemiFinalE           .o.
    ShortRootFinalE      .o.
    LongRootFinalE       .o.
    FinalE               .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! consonant-related rules
    !-------------------------------
    DropFinalVC          .o.
    DropFinalC           .o.
    DropWeakC            .o.
    DropUvular           .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! allomorphy rules
    !-------------------------------
    AddE                 .o.
    DeleteEBeforeVowel   .o.
    ResolveG             .o.
    ResolveI             .o.
    OptativeAllomorphs   .o.
    ResolveDemAnaphor    .o.
    !-------------------------------
    ! clean up
    !-------------------------------
    BaseFinalEndings     .o.
    PreventGemination    .o.
    CleanupDigraph       .o.
    AssimilateEnclitic   .o.
    CleanupMorphBoundary .o.
    VelarUvularRounding  .o.
    DropMiddleVowel      .o.
    VowelDominance       .o.
    MatchVoicing         .o.
    Undoubling
];


define FilteredLex [ Filters .o. Lexicon ];

! only analyzes and generates lowercased forms
define GrammarLowercase [ [ [Exceptions .P. FilteredLex] | ParallelForms ] .o. Rules ];

! analyzes and generates uppercased and lowercased forms
define GrammarUppercase [ GrammarLowercase .o. Uppercase ];

! allows the user to type ASCII arrows
define AllowAsciiArrow [ GrammarLowercase.i .o. AsciiArrow ];
define GrammarAscii [ AllowAsciiArow.i ];
